lexc/misc/enhudet.lexc
!!!enhudet.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Det[gcat] [stem] +Def[lfea] +fwConsonant[lfea] +fwVowel[lfea]

      
LEXICON Root
Det;


LEXICON Det
a[stem]+Det[gcat]+Def[lfea]+fwConsonant[lfea]:a #;
az[stem]+Det[gcat]+Def[lfea]+fwVowel[lfea]:az #;
csupa AddDet;
egy AddDet;


LEXICON AddDet
+Det:0     #;
